Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.585

Program rates. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) For the 2021-22 school year, rates for the early childhood education and assistance program must be set at a level at least 10 percent higher than the rates established in section 225, chapter 415, Laws of 2019.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that rate increases shall be informed by the department's 2020 early childhood education and assistance program rate study.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[ 2021 c 199 s 302.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.